Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-1103
Reports and proceedings; how published; cost.

Publication under sections 19-1101 and 19-1102 shall be made in one legal newspaper in or of general circulation in such city or village. If no legal newspaper in or of general circulation is published in the city or village, then such publication shall be made in one legal newspaper published in or of general circulation within the county in which such city or village is located. The cost of publication shall be paid out of the general funds of such city or village.

Laws 1919, c. 183, § 3, p. 410;

C.S.1922, § 4378;

C.S.1929, § 17-576;

R.S.1943, § 19-1103;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 13;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 101.